Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1914.01
Unlicensed child care; investigation.

When the department receives a complaint of allegedly improper unlicensed care, the department shall investigate the claim and shall go to the premises of the alleged unlicensed program to ascertain if child care is being provided there which must be licensed according to the Child Care Licensing Act. If unlicensed child care is occurring in violation of the act, the person providing the unlicensed care shall have thirty days to either become licensed or cease providing unlicensed child care. The department shall visit the program again after such thirty-day period. If the person has not initiated action to become licensed or ceased providing unlicensed child care, the department may involve law enforcement and may proceed under sections 71-1914.02 and 71-1914.03.

Laws 1997, LB 310, § 8;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 75.